Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
PART 3 Excise Taxation

Cross references.

Sales and use taxes, T. 48, C. 8.

3-4-130.
Imposition of tax by municipalities authorized; rate of tax.

The governing authority of each municipality in which the sale of distilled spirits by the drink is permitted may impose, levy, and collect an excise tax upon the sale of the beverages, which tax shall not exceed 3 percent of the charge to the public for the beverages.

This Code section shall not apply to the sale of fermented beverages made in whole or in part from malt or any similar fermented beverage.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 744, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-2906, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-4-131.
Imposition of tax by counties authorized; rate of tax; taxation by both county and municipality located within county.

The governing authority of each county in which the sale of distilled spirits by the drink is permitted may impose, levy, and collect an excise tax upon the sale of the beverages, which tax shall not exceed 3 percent of the charge to the public for the beverages.

No tax authorized by subsection (a) of the Code section may be imposed, levied, and collected in any portion of a county in which the tax provided for in Code Section 3-4-130 is being imposed, levied, and collected.

The tax authorized by this Code section shall not apply to the sale of fermented beverages made in whole or in part from malt or any similar fermented beverage.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 744, § 2; Code 1933, § 5A-2907, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-4-132.
Manner of imposition, payment, and collection of tax.

The rate of taxation, the manner of its imposition, payment, and collection, and all other procedures related to the tax authorized by Code Sections 3-4-130 and 3-4-131 shall be as provided for by each county or municipality electing to exercise powers conferred by Code Sections 3-4-130 and 3-4-131.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 744, § 3; Code 1933, § 5A-2908, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-4-133.
Allowance and reimbursement to dealers collecting tax of percentage of tax due.

Dealers collecting the tax authorized by Code Sections 3-4-130 and 3-4-131 shall be allowed a percentage of the tax due and accounted for and shall be reimbursed in the form of a deduction in submitting, reporting, and paying the amount due, if the amount is not delinquent at the time of payment. The rate of the deduction shall be the same rate authorized for deductions from state tax under Chapter 8 of Title 48.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 744, § 4; Code 1933, § 5A-2909, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.